Massachusetts, session 194th, S954.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 19B of said chapter Chapter 94C, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by adding the following subsection:-
(i) Every state university campus, as listed in section 5 of chapter 15A of the General
Laws, shall provide training in the administration of opioid antagonists to every resident assistant
employed by said campuses. Campuses shall provide and maintain opioid antagonists onsite in
each college-operated housing. Said opioid antagonists shall be accessible by every resident
assistant for use during emergencies to any student, staff or other individual on college-operated
housing premises suspected of having an opioid overdose. The department, in consultation with
the department of higher education, shall adopt regulations to implement this subsection.
of 1